Utah statutes.
77-20-8.5.   Sureties -- Surrender of defendant -- Arrest of defendant.
(1) (a) Sureties may at any time prior to a defendant's failure to appear
surrender the defendant and obtain exoneration of bail, by notifying the clerk
of the court in which the bail was posted of the defendant's surrender and
requesting exoneration.  Notification shall be made immediately following the
surrender by surface mail, electronic mail, or fax.
(b)  To effect surrender, a certified copy of the surety's undertaking from
the court in which it was posted or a copy of the bail agreement with the
defendant shall be delivered to the on-duty jailer, who shall detain the
defendant in the on-duty jailer's custody as upon a commitment, and shall in
writing acknowledge the surrender upon the copy of the undertaking or bail
agreement. The certified copy of the undertaking or copy of the bail agreement
upon which the acknowledgment of surrender is endorsed shall be filed with the
court.  The court may then, upon proper application, order the undertaking
exonerated and may order a refund of any paid premium, or part of a premium,
as it finds just.
(2)  For the purpose of surrendering the defendant, the sureties may:
(a)  arrest the defendant:
(i)  at any time before the defendant is finally exonerated; and
(ii)  at any place within the state; and
(b)  surrender the defendant to any county jail booking facility in Utah.
(3)  An arrest under this section is not a basis for exoneration of the bond
under Section 77-20b-101.
(4)  A surety acting under this section is subject to Title 53, Chapter 11,
Bail Bond Recovery Act.
